District of Columbia statutes.
1-203.02

Legislative power.

Except as provided in §§ 1-206.01 to 1-206.03, the legislative power of the District shall extend to all rightful subjects of legislation within the District consistent with the Constitution of the United States and the provisions of this chapter subject to all the restrictions and limitations imposed upon the states by the 10th section of the 1st article of the Constitution of the United States.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 784, Pub. L. 93-198, title III, § 302

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-204.
1973 Ed., § 1-124.